District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Behavioral Health Housing Voucher Transparency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. The Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013, effective
December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 7-1141.01 et seq.), is amended by
adding a new Part C to read as follows:

“PART C.
“Sec. 5120d. Housing voucher standardized checklist requirement.
“(a) The Department shall develop and publish a standardized checklist for the
application process for housing vouchers administered by the Department.
“(b) The checklist shall include:
“(1) A list of all required documents, such as identification and consent forms,
that an applicant must submit to the Department;
“(2) Submission deadlines for each document;
“(3) Identification of responsible parties for each step or document submission,
including caseworkers, applicants, or property managers; and
(4)Where signatures are required to verify the submission of required documents.
“(c) The Department shall publish the checklist on its website and send it via email to all
caseworkers, property managers, and housing voucher recipients currently in its system. The
Department shall also provide the checklist to all individuals who start the housing voucher
application process.
“Sec. 5120e. Secure online portal.
“(a) The Department shall establish and maintain a secure online portal for applicants,
caseworkers, and property managers to track in real time the status of a housing voucher
application; provided, that property managers’ access to the online portal shall be limited to
viewing the applicant’s name, caseworker’s name, and any documentation required to be
completed by the property manager.
“(b) The portal shall include:

“(1) Secure login access for applicants via unique passcodes that they can share
with their caseworker;
“(2) The status of the applicant’s voucher application, including a list of
completed and pending tasks;
“(3) Automated reminders for impending deadlines or pending actions that are
sent to the applicant via email or text message; and
“(4) A feedback section to allow users to report issues or provide suggestions for
improvement.
“(c) The online portal shall comply with all relevant legal and privacy laws and
regulations to protect client information.
“Sec. 5120f. Implementation and training.
“The Department shall conduct or create a training video for all users to support the
adoption of the portal and ensure the checklist and portal are fully integrated into existing case
management systems used by the Department within 180 days of the portal’s launch, such that:
“(1) Caseworkers can access and update the checklist and portal directly through
the case management system; and
“(2) Updates made in the portal are synchronized in real-time with the case
management system to ensure data consistency and accuracy.
“Sec. 5120g. Monitoring and evaluation.
“(a) The Department shall establish a monitoring system to assess the checklist and portal
in managing voucher-related documentation, including tracking:
“(1) The average processing time for voucher applications;
“(2) The approval rate of voucher applications; and

“(3) Any identified barriers to completing applications or securing
approvals.
“(b) The Department shall gather feedback from users to evaluate and improve the
checklist and portal processes.
“(c) The Department shall publish, on a quarterly basis, a report on its website that
includes:
“(1) The average processing time for voucher applications;
“(2) The approval rate of voucher applications; and
“(3) A summary of user feedback and steps taken to address identified
challenges.".
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report statement
required by section 602(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved 1 December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(3)).
100 Sec. 4. Effective date.
101 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
102 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
103 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
104 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1).